Utah statutes.
57-21-7.   Prohibited conduct -- Aiding or abetting in discriminatory actions -- Obstruction of division investigation -- Reprisals.

(1)  It is a discriminatory housing practice to do any of the following:

(a)  coerce, intimidate, threaten, or interfere with any person:

(i)  in the exercise or enjoyment of any right granted or protected under this chapter;

(ii)  because that person exercised any right granted or protected under this chapter; or

(iii)  because that person aided or encouraged any other person in the exercise or enjoyment of any right granted or protected under this chapter;

(b)  aid, abet, incite, compel, or coerce a person to engage in any of the practices prohibited by this chapter;

(c)  attempt to aid, abet, incite, compel, or coerce a person to engage in any of the practices prohibited by this chapter;

(d)  obstruct or prevent any person from complying with this chapter, or any order issued under this chapter;

(e)  resist, prevent, impede, or interfere with the director or any division employees or representatives in the performance of duty under this chapter; or

(f)  engage in any reprisal against any person because that person:

(i)  opposed a practice prohibited under this chapter; or

(ii)  filed a complaint, testified, assisted, or participated in any manner in any investigation, proceeding, or hearing under this chapter.

(2)  This section also applies to discriminatory housing practices because of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, familial status, source of income, or disability based upon a person's association with another person.



Amended by Chapter 114, 1993 General Session

